Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.26.080

When creditor process enforceable against bank.

(1) Subject to subsection (2) of this section, creditor process with respect to a special deposit is not enforceable against the bank holding the special deposit.

(2) Creditor process is enforceable against the bank holding a special deposit with respect to an amount the bank is obligated to pay a beneficiary or a depositor if the process:

(a) Is served on the bank;

(b) Provides sufficient information to permit the bank to identify the depositor or the beneficiary from the bank's books and records; and

(c) Gives the bank a reasonable opportunity to act on the process.

(3) Creditor process served on a bank before it is enforceable against the bank under subsection (2) of this section does not create a right of the creditor against the bank, or a duty of the bank to the creditor. Other law determines whether creditor process creates a lien enforceable against the beneficiary on a contingent interest of a beneficiary, including a depositor as a beneficiary, even if not enforceable against the bank.

[ 2024 c 23 s 9.]